Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB703.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 100.283 is amended to read as follows:
After the approval of a subdivision plat by the planning commission, it shall be recorded
at the expense of the subdivider in the office of the county clerk. The plat shall be in the
form of a rectangle and the clerk shall not be required to record a plat exceeding twenty-
four (24) inches on one (1) side and thirty-six (36) inches on the other. The county clerk
shall provide a plat cabinet with an appropriate index for those plats which are too large
to be placed in a plat book.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/20/2026 7:42 AM Jacketed